Oklahoma, session 2025, SB321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1357.10a of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The sale of disaster preparedness supplies shall be exempt


from the tax imposed by Section 1354 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes if the sale takes place during a period beginning at 12:01


a.m. on the last Friday in March and September and ending at 12


midnight on the following Sunday, covering a period of three (3)


days.


B. As used in this section:


1. “Disaster preparedness supply” means an item purchased in


preparation or response to a disaster, including any fire, flood,

Req. No. 1179 Page 1


storm, tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether


man-made, resulting from war, or resulting from natural causes.


Disaster preparedness supply shall include the following categories


of items:


a. disaster preparedness general supplies,


b. disaster preparedness safety supplies,


c. disaster preparedness food-related supplies, and


d. disaster preparedness fastening supplies;


2. “Disaster preparedness general supply” means a general


purpose item that may be used in preparation or response to a


disaster;


3. “Disaster preparedness safety supply” means a safety item


that may be used in preparation or response to a disaster;


4. “Disaster preparedness food-related supply” means a food or


food-related item that may be used in preparation or response to a


disaster; and


5. “Disaster preparedness fastening supply” means a fastening


item or an item used for securing property or covering property that


may be used in preparation or response to a disaster.


C. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall promulgate any rules


necessary to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 1179 Page 2


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1179 QD 12/31/2024 12:13:34 PM









































Req. No. 1179 Page 3